Maryland, session 2026, SB0334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(H) “COMMON HOUSEHOLD TOOL” INCLUDES A SCREWDRIVER, A PIPE
WRENCH, PLIERS, A HACKSAW, A CROWBAR, AN ELECTRIC DRILL, A ROTARY TOOL, A
HAMMER, A CHISEL, A FILE, AND A CRESCENT WRENCH.
[(h)] (I) (1) “Copycat weapon” means:
– 1 –

Ch. 771 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) a semiautomatic centerfire rifle that can accept a detachable
magazine and has any two of the following:
1. a folding stock;
2. a grenade launcher or flare launcher; or
3. a flash suppressor;
(ii) a semiautomatic centerfire rifle that has a fixed magazine with
the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds;
(iii) a semiautomatic centerfire rifle that has an overall length of less
than 29 inches;
(iv) a semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine that can accept
more than 10 rounds;
(v) a semiautomatic shotgun that has a folding stock; or
(vi) a shotgun with a revolving cylinder.
(2) “Copycat weapon” does not include an assault long gun or an assault
pistol.
(J) “CRUCIFORM TRIGGER BAR” MEANS A COMPONENT IN A
SEMIAUTOMATIC PISTOL THAT:
(1) SERVES AS A LINK BETWEEN THE TRIGGER AND THE FIRING PIN;
AND
(2) HAS ITS SEAR INCORPORATED INTO A CROSS–SHAPED SURFACE.
[(i)] (K) “Detachable magazine” means an ammunition feeding device that can
be removed readily from a firearm without requiring disassembly of the firearm action or
without the use of a tool, including a bullet or cartridge.
[(j)] (L) “Flash suppressor” means a device that functions, or is intended to
function, to perceptibly reduce or redirect muzzle flash from the shooter’s field of vision.
[(k)] (M) “Hellfire trigger” means a device that, when installed in or attached to
a firearm, disengages the trigger return spring when the trigger is pulled.
[(l)] (N) “Licensed firearms dealer” means a person who holds a dealer’s license
under Title 5, Subtitle 1 of the Public Safety Article.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 771
(M) (O) (1) “MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL” MEANS ANY
SEMIAUTOMATIC PISTOL WITH A CRUCIFORM TRIGGER BAR THAT CAN BE READILY
CONVERTED BY HAND OR BY USING COMMON HOUSEHOLD TOOLS INTO A MACHINE
GUN BY THE INSTALLATION OR ATTACHMENT OF A PISTOL CONVERTER AS A
REPLACEMENT FOR THE SLIDE’S BACKPLATE WITHOUT ANY ADDITIONAL
ENGINEERING, MACHINING, OR MODIFICATION OF THE PISTOL’S TRIGGER
MECHANISM.
(2) “MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL” INCLUDES A PISTOL WITH
A CRUCIFORM TRIGGER BAR AND A POLYMER NOTCH OR OTHER PIECE OF POLYMER
MOLDED INTO THE REAR OF THE PISTOL FRAME WHERE A PISTOL CONVERTER CAN
BE ATTACHED OR INSTALLED A SEMIAUTOMATIC PISTOL DESCRIBED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A TAB OR OTHER
PIECE OF MATERIAL IS LOCATED ON THE REAR PORTION OF THE PISTOL FRAME TO
BLOCK THE ATTACHMENT OF A PISTOL CONVERTER, IF THE TAB OR OTHER PIECE OF
MATERIAL CAN BE READILY REMOVED WITH A COMMON HOUSEHOLD TOOL.
(3) “MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
HAMMER–FIRED SEMIAUTOMATIC PISTOL OR A STRIKER–FIRED SEMIAUTOMATIC
PISTOL WITHOUT A CRUCIFORM TRIGGER BAR, WHICH INSTEAD HAS A TRIGGER BAR
THAT IS SHIELDED FROM INTERFERENCE BY A PISTOL CONVERTER.
(N) (P) (1) “PISTOL CONVERTER” MEANS ANY DEVICE OR INSTRUMENT
THAT, WHEN INSTALLED IN OR ATTACHED TO THE REAR OF THE SLIDE OF A
SEMIAUTOMATIC PISTOL, REPLACES THE BACKPLATE AND INTERFERES WITH THE
TRIGGER MECHANISM, WHICH ENABLES THE PISTOL TO SHOOT AUTOMATICALLY
MORE THAN ONE SHOT BY A SINGLE FUNCTION OF THE TRIGGER.
(2) “PISTOL CONVERTER” INCLUDES A PISTOL CONVERTER
MANUFACTURED USING A THREE–DIMENSIONAL PRINTER.
[(m)] (O) (Q) (1) “Rapid fire activator” means any device, including a
removable manual or power–driven activating device, constructed so that, when installed
in or attached to a firearm:
(i) the rate at which the trigger is activated increases; or
(ii) the rate of fire increases.
(2) “Rapid fire activator” includes a bump stock, trigger crank, hellfire
trigger, binary trigger system, burst trigger system, switch/auto–sear, PISTOL
CONVERTER, or a copy or a similar device, regardless of the producer or manufacturer.
– 3 –

Ch. 771 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “Rapid fire activator” does not include a semiautomatic replacement
trigger that improves the performance and functionality over the stock trigger.
[(n)] (P) (R) “Switch/auto–sear” means a device that applies force to a firearm’s
trigger bar to prevent it from limiting the weapon to firing only one round each time the
trigger is depressed.
[(o)] (Q) (S) “Trigger crank” means a device that, when installed in or attached to a
firearm, repeatedly activates the trigger of the firearm through the use of a crank, a lever,
or any other part that is turned in a circular motion.
4–302.
This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) if acting within the scope of official business, personnel of the United
States government or a unit of that government, members of the armed forces of the United
States or of the National Guard, law enforcement personnel of the State or a local unit in
the State, or a railroad police officer authorized under Title 3 of the Public Safety Article
or 49 U.S.C. § 28101;
(2) a firearm modified to render it permanently inoperative;
(3) possession, importation, manufacture, receipt for manufacture,
shipment for manufacture, storage, purchases, sales, and transport to or by a licensed
firearms dealer or manufacturer who is:
(i) providing or servicing an assault weapon [or], A detachable
magazine, OR A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL for a law enforcement unit or for
personnel exempted under item (1) of this section;
(ii) acting to sell or transfer an assault weapon [or], A detachable
magazine, OR A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL to a licensed firearm dealer in
another state or to an individual purchaser in another state through a licensed firearms
dealer; or
(iii) acting to return to a customer in another state an assault weapon
OR A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL transferred to the licensed firearms dealer
or manufacturer under the terms of a warranty or for repair;
(4) organizations that are required or authorized by federal law governing
their specific business or activity to maintain assault weapons and applicable ammunition
[and], detachable magazines, AND MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOLS;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 771
(5) the receipt of an assault weapon [or], A detachable magazine, OR A
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL by inheritance, and possession of the inherited
assault weapon [or], detachable magazine, OR MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL, if
the decedent lawfully possessed the assault weapon [or], detachable magazine, OR
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL and the person inheriting the assault weapon [or],
detachable magazine, OR MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL is not otherwise
disqualified from possessing a regulated firearm;
(6) the receipt of an assault weapon [or], A detachable magazine, OR A
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL by a personal representative of an estate for
purposes of exercising the powers and duties of a personal representative of an estate;
(7) possession by a person who is retired in good standing from service with
a law enforcement agency of the State or a local unit in the State and is not otherwise
prohibited from receiving an assault weapon [or], detachable magazine, OR MACHINE GUN
CONVERTIBLE PISTOL if:
(i) the assault weapon [or], detachable magazine, OR MACHINE
GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL is sold or transferred to the person by the law enforcement
agency on retirement; or
(ii) the assault weapon [or], detachable magazine, OR MACHINE
GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL was purchased or obtained by the person for official use with
the law enforcement agency before retirement;
(8) possession or transport by an employee of an armored car company if
the individual is acting within the scope of employment and has a permit issued under Title
5, Subtitle 3 of the Public Safety Article; [or]
(9) possession, receipt, and testing by, or shipping to or from:
(i) an ISO 17025 accredited, National Institute of Justice–approved
ballistics testing laboratory; or
(ii) a facility or entity that manufactures or provides research and
development testing, analysis, or engineering for personal protective equipment or vehicle
protection systems;
(10) THE TEMPORARY TRANSFER OF A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE
PISTOL TO A LICENSED REGULATED FIREARMS DEALER OR GUNSMITH FOR THE
PURPOSE OF SERVICING THE MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL;
(11) THE RECEIPT OF A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL BY A
LICENSED REGULATED FIREARMS DEALER OR GUNSMITH FOR THE PURPOSE OF
SERVICING THE MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL AND THE RETURN OF THE
– 5 –

Ch. 771 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL TO ITS LAWFUL OWNER BY A LICENSED
REGULATED FIREARMS DEALER OR GUNSMITH ON THE COMPLETION OF SERVICING
THE MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL; OR
(12) THE RECEIPT OF A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL BY A LAW
ENFORCEMENT UNIT, BARRACKS, OR STATION, A STATE OR LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, OR A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER IF THE
PERSON IS SURRENDERING THE FIREARM;
(13) THE TEMPORARY GRATUITOUS EXCHANGE OF A MACHINE GUN
CONVERTIBLE PISTOL; OR
(14) THE SALE, OFFER FOR SALE, PURCHASE, RECEIPT, OR TRANSFER
OF A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL TO OR BY A PERSON WHO:
(I) IS CURRENTLY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICIAL, AS
DEFINED IN § 4–201 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(II) HAS RETIRED AS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICIAL IN GOOD
STANDING FROM A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE UNITED STATES, THE
STATE OR ANOTHER STATE, OR A LOCAL UNIT IN THE STATE OR ANOTHER STATE
AND POSSESSES A VALID CREDENTIAL ISSUED UNDER 18 U.S.C. § 926C.
4–305.2.
(A) ON EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY NOT MANUFACTURE, SELL, OFFER FOR SALE,
PURCHASE, RECEIVE, OR TRANSFER A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE MAY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING PUBLISHING A LIST OF PROHIBITED
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOLS.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER” MEANS A
SPOUSE, CHILD, STEPCHILD, PARENT, STEPPARENT, SIBLING, OR STEPSIBLING.
(2) (I) A PERSON WHO LAWFULLY OBTAINED AND POSSESSES A
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL MAY SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER A
MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL TO AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER WHO IS
NOT PROHIBITED UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW FROM POSSESSING A FIREARM.
(II) A PERSON WHO IS NOT OTHERWISE PROHIBITED UNDER
FEDERAL OR STATE LAW FROM POSSESSING A FIREARM MAY PURCHASE OR
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 771
OTHERWISE RECEIVE A MACHINE GUN CONVERTIBLE PISTOL FROM AN IMMEDIATE
FAMILY MEMBER WHO LAWFULLY OBTAINED THE PISTOL.
4–306.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person who violates this
subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding 3 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(b) (1) A person who uses an assault weapon, a rapid fire activator, or a
magazine that has a capacity of more than 10 rounds of ammunition, in the commission of
a felony or a crime of violence as defined in § 5–101 of the Public Safety Article is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction, in addition to any other sentence imposed for the felony
or crime of violence, shall be sentenced under this subsection.
(2) (i) For a first violation, the person shall be sentenced to
imprisonment for not less than 5 years and not exceeding 20 years.
(ii) The court may not impose less than the minimum sentence of 5
years.
(iii) The mandatory minimum sentence of 5 years may not be
suspended.
(iv) Except as otherwise provided in § 4–305 of the Correctional
Services Article, the person is not eligible for parole in less than 5 years.
(3) (i) For each subsequent violation, the person shall be sentenced to
imprisonment for not less than 10 years and not exceeding 20 years.
(ii) The court may not impose less than the minimum sentence of 10
years.
(iii) A sentence imposed under this paragraph shall be consecutive to
and not concurrent with any other sentence imposed for the felony or crime of violence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 7 –